North Dakota, session 69, HB1437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Academic tenure - Policy - Evaluations.
1. By July 1, 2026, institutions of higher education under the control of the state board of higher
education offering faculty academic tenure shall develop and adopt a policy for tenured and
tenure-track faculty employed by the institution, which:
a. Defines progression and advancement criteria at each stage of tenure progression,
including criteria for continued post-tenure review.
b. Establishes a procedure for annual evaluation of all nontenure, tenure-track, and tenured
faculty by the president of the institution or the designee of the president.
c. Establishes a procedure for post-tenure evaluations, which must be informed by the
annual evaluations under subdivision b and conducted by a committee appointed by the
president of the institution or the designee of the president. The first post-tenure
evaluation must be completed within three years. Subsequent post-tenure evaluations
must be completed at least every five years or more frequently.
d. Provides the composition of a culminating post-tenure evaluation committee must include
the administrative supervisor of the faculty member being evaluated, at least one ranking
administrator, and tenured faculty comprising no less than one - third and no more than
one - half of the committee .
e. Defines the outcome of an unsatisfactory review of post-tenured faculty, which may be
removal from the position. The decision to remove faculty from a position must be made
by the employing institution and the state board of higher education.
f. Is approved by the state board of higher education.
2. Advertisement of open faculty positions by institutions of higher education under the control of
the state board of higher education offering faculty academic tenure must designate the
position as nontenure-track or tenure-track. Upon offering a tenure-track position to a
candidate, the institution shall provide the candidate the policy required under this section.

H. B. NO. 1437 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1437.
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 7 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 28 Nays 19 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State